Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 106.120 is amended to read:
106.120. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Judicial officer” means:
(A) A judicial officer of this state as that term is defined in ORS  1.210 and includes but is not
limited to a judge of a municipal court and a justice of the peace.
(B) An active judge of a federal court.
(C) An active United States magistrate judge.
(b) “Secular organization”  means an organization that occupies a place in the lives of the
organization’s members parallel to that filled by a church or particular religious authority.
(2) Marriages may be solemnized by:
(a) A judicial officer;
(b) A county clerk  or deputy of the county clerk ;
(c) Religious congregations or organizations as indicated in ORS 106.150 (2);
(d) A clergyperson of any religious congregation or organization who is  authorized by the reli-
gious congregation or organization to solemnize marriages;
(e) Secular organizations as indicated in ORS 106.150 (2); or
(f) A celebrant or officiant of any secular organization described in paragraph (e) of this  sub-
section who is authorized by the secular organization to solemnize marriages.
(3) A person authorized to solemnize marriages under subsection (2) of  this section may
solemnize a marriage anywhere in this state.
(4)(a) When a marriage is solemnized by a tax, appellate or  circuit judge of this state, the clerk
of the court or the county clerk shall collect a fee of $117 and deposit the fee  in the Judicial De-
partment Operating Account established in ORS 1.009.
(b) When a marriage is solemnized by a county clerk  or a deputy of the county  clerk , the
county clerk  or the deputy of the county clerk  shall collect a  fee of $117, as provided in ORS
205.320.
(c) The fee described in this subsection may be collected only if:
(A) The marriage is solemnized during normal working hours, excluding holidays;
(B) The marriage is solemnized in court facilities or a county clerk’s office; or
(C) More than a minimal amount of staff  time or other court or county clerk’s office resources
are used in connection with the solemnization.
Enrolled House Bill 3386 (HB 3386-INTRO) Page 1
(d) The Chief Justice  of the Supreme Court or the county clerk may establish a written proce-
dure for waiver of the fee required under this subsection in  exigent circumstances, including but
not limited to indigency of the parties to the marriage.
(5) In addition to any fee collected under subsection (4) of this section, a judicial officer of  this
state [ and], a county clerk  or  a deputy of a county clerk  may charge and accept an agreed upon
personal payment not to exceed  $100 plus actual costs for the solemnization of a marriage if that
solemnization is performed:
(a) At a place other than the courthouse  where the judicial officer [ or], county clerk or deputy
of the county clerk  serves; or
(b) Outside of the normal working hours of  the  judicial [ officer’s or county clerk’s normal
working hours ] officer, county clerk or deputy of the county clerk .
(6) The charging and accepting of a personal payment by a judicial officer of this state  [ or], a
county clerk  or a deputy of a county clerk  under subsection (5) of this section does not constitute
a violation of any of the provisions of ORS chapter 244.
(7) The amount of actual costs charged by a  judicial officer of this state [ or], a county clerk
or a deputy of a county clerk  under subsection (5) of this section may not exceed:
(a) Actual expenses for food and lodging as verified by receipts.
(b) If travel is made  by personal vehicle, the actual number of round-trip miles from the judicial
officer’s [ or], county clerk’s or county clerk’s deputy’s  home or office, whichever  is greater, com-
pensated at the rate of reimbursement then  provided by the State of Oregon to its employees or, if
travel is made by a commercial carrier, reimbursement shall be made of  the actual costs thereof,
verified by receipts.
(8) A judicial officer of this state [ or], a  county clerk  or a deputy of a county clerk  shall
maintain records of the amount of personal payments  received for performing marriages, of actual
costs and the supporting documentation related thereto for a period of four years.
(9) The parties to a marriage solemnized by a tax, appellate or  circuit judge of this state shall
show to the judge proof of payment  of the fee required under subsection (4)(a) of this section before
solemnization. Except as provided in subsection (4)(d) of this  section, the judge may not solemnize
a marriage without proof of payment of the fee.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 205.320 is amended to read:
205.320. (1) In every county there shall  be charged and collected in advance by the county clerk,
for the benefit of the county, the following fees, and no more, for the following purposes  and ser-
vices:
(a) For filing and making entry when required by law of any instrument required or  permitted
by law to be filed, when it is not recorded, $5 for each page.
(b) For filing and  making entry of the assignment or satisfaction of any filed, but not recorded,
instrument, $5 for each page.
(c) For each official certificate, $3.75.
(d)(A) For recording any instrument required or permitted by law to be recorded, $5 for each
page, but the minimum fee shall not be less than $5. As used in  this subparagraph, “page” means
one side of a sheet 14 inches, or less, long and 8-1/2 inches, or less, wide.
(B) For supplying to private parties copies of records  or files, including by electronic delivery
of images, not more  than $3.75 for locating a record requested by the party and 25 cents for each
page. As used in this subparagraph, “page” means one side of a sheet  14 inches, or less, long and
8-1/2 inches, or less, wide.
(C) For each official certificate, $3.75.
(e) For taking an affidavit for and  making and issuing a marriage license and registering the
return of the license, or for taking an affidavit  for and registering a Declaration of Domestic Part-
nership, $25.
(f) For solemnizing a marriage under ORS 106.120, $117. This  paragraph does not require that
the county  clerk or deputy of the county clerk  charge a fee for solemnizing a marriage after
normal working hours or on Saturdays or legal holidays.  This paragraph does not prohibit a county
Enrolled House Bill 3386 (HB 3386-INTRO) Page 2
clerk or a deputy of the county clerk  from  charging and accepting a personal payment for
solemnizing a marriage if otherwise authorized by ORS 106.120.
(g) For taking and certifying acknowledgment  or proof of execution of any instrument, the fee
established in the schedule adopted by the Secretary of State under ORS 194.400.
(h) For  issuing any license required by law, other than a marriage or liquor license, and for
which no fee is otherwise provided by law, $5.
(i) For any service the clerk may be required or  authorized to perform and for which no fee is
provided by law, such fees as may favorably compare with those established by this  section for
similar services and as may be  established by order or rule of the county court or board of county
commissioners.
(j) For recording  any instrument under ORS 205.130 (2), as required by ordinance pursuant to
ORS 203.148.
(k) In addition to and not in lieu of the fees charged under paragraph  (d) of this subsection, for
each additional municipal assessment lien recorded under ORS 93.643, $5.
(L) In addition to and not in lieu of the fees  charged under paragraph (d) of this subsection, for
each additional assignment, release or satisfaction of any recorded instrument, $5.
(m) In addition to and not in  lieu of the fees charged under paragraph (d) of this subsection, for
each additional transaction described under ORS 205.236, $5.
(n) In addition to and not in lieu of the fees charged under paragraph  (d) of this subsection, for
each additional lien recorded under ORS 311.675, $5.
(o) For preparing and recording the certificate under ORS 517.280, $20 or such other  fee that
is established by the county governing body.
(p) In addition to and not in lieu of the fees charged under paragraph (d)  of this subsection, for
each additional claim listed on an affidavit of annual compliance under ORS 517.210, $5.
(q) In addition to and not in lieu of the fees charged under paragraph (d)  of this subsection, for
each additional name listed on a cooperative contract under ORS 62.360 (2) or for recording  the
termination of a cooperative contract under ORS 62.360 (4), $5.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law, five percent of any fee  or tax that is not collected for the
benefit of the county clerk shall be deducted from the fee or tax. The moneys deducted shall be
expended for acquiring storage  and retrieval systems, payment of expenses incurred in collecting the
fee or tax and maintaining and restoring records as authorized by the county  clerk. Moneys col-
lected under this subsection shall  be deposited in a county clerk records fund established by the
county governing body. No moneys shall be deducted under this subsection from:
(a) Fees collected for the Domestic Violence Fund under ORS 106.045.
(b) Fees collected for conciliation services under ORS 107.615.
(c) Real estate transfer taxes enacted prior to January 1, 1998.
(d) Fees collected under ORS 205.323 for the Oregon Land Information System Fund.
(e) Fees collected  under ORS 205.323 (1)(c) for the housing-related programs listed in ORS
294.187 (2)(b).
Enrolled House Bill 3386 (HB 3386-INTRO) Page 3
Passed by House March 6, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 28, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3386 (HB 3386-INTRO) Page 4